Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-154
Fees.

(1)(a) For each original certificate of title issued by a
county for a motor vehicle or trailer, the fee shall be ten dollars. Three
dollars and twenty-five cents shall be retained by the county. Four dollars
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor
Vehicles Cash Fund. Two dollars shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the General Fund. Seventy-five cents shall be remitted to the State
Treasurer for credit as follows: Twenty cents to the Motor Vehicle Fraud Cash
Fund; forty-five cents to the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund; and ten cents
to the Nebraska Motor Vehicle Industry Licensing Fund.

(b) For each original certificate of title issued by a county
for an all-terrain vehicle, a utility-type vehicle, or a minibike, the fee
shall be ten dollars. Three dollars and twenty-five cents shall be retained
by the county. Four dollars shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. Two dollars shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund. Seventy-five cents
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit as follows: Twenty cents
to the Motor Vehicle Fraud Cash Fund; and fifty-five cents to the Nebraska
State Patrol Cash Fund.

(2) For each original certificate of title issued by the department
for a vehicle except as provided in section 60-159.01, the fee shall be ten
dollars. Four dollars shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles
Cash Fund. Six dollars shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 54;

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 16;

Laws 2006, LB 1061, § 7;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 15;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 7.